zh-CN: 脚部护具类型: 固定; 无; 可拆卸; 其他
bg-BG: Тип протектор за стъпало: Фиксиран; Няма; Подвижен; Друг
ro-RO: Tipul de protecție pentru picior: Fix; Fără; Detașabil; Altele
it: tipo di protezione per il piede: Fisso; Nessuno; Rimovibile; Altro
pt-PT: tipo protetor de pés: Fixo; Nenhum; Amovível; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta zaščite za noge: Fiksno; Brez; Odstranljivo; Drugo
de: Art des Fußschutzes: Feststehend; Keine; Abnehmbar; Sonstiges
da: Type af fodbeskyttelse: Fast; Ingen; Aftagelig; Andet
hu: Lábvédő típusa: Fix; Nincs; Eltávolítható; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de proteção para o pé: Fixo; Nenhum; Removível; Outro
ko: 발 보호대 유형: 고정식; 없음; 탈착식; 기타
fr: Type de protection du pied: Fixe; Aucun; Amovible; Autre
el: Τύπος προστατευτικού κουντεπιέ/πέλματος: Σταθερό; Κανένα; Αφαιρούμενο; Άλλο
zh-TW: 足部護具類型: 固定式; 無; 可拆卸; 其他
cs: Typ chrániče nohou: Pevný; Žádný; Odnímatelný; Jiný
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์ป้องกันเท้า: แบบตายตัว; ไม่มี; แบบถอดได้; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de protector de pies: Fijo; Ninguno; Removible; Otro
ja: フットガードタイプ: 固定式; なし; 取り外し可能; その他
ru: Тип защиты стопы: Фиксированный; Отсутствует; Съемный; Другое
en: Foot guard type: Fixed; None; Removable; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta štitnika za noge: Fiksni; Nema; Odvojivi; Ostalo
vi: Loại bảo vệ chân: Cố định; Không có; Có thể tháo rời; Khác
tr: Ayak koruma tipi: Sabit; Yok; Çıkarılabilir; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ chrániča nôh: Pevný; Žiadny; Odnímateľný; Iné
nl: Voetbeschermer type: Vast; Geen; Afneembaar; Overige
lt-LT: Pėdos apsaugos tipas: Fiksuotas; Nėra; Nuimamas; Kita
pl: Typ osłony stopy: Stała; Brak; Odpinana; Inny
sv: Typ av fotskydd: Fast; Inget; Avtagbar; Övrigt
fi: Jalkasuojan tyyppi: Kiinteä; Ei mitään; Irrotettava; Muu
nb: Fotbeskyttelsestype: Fast; Ingen; Avtakbar; Annet